src/fst/stems/numerals.lexc
! Copyright © 2015–2019 Alberta Language Technology Lab (ALTLab)
! http://altlab.artsrn.ualberta.ca/
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
! but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
! MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
! GNU Affero General Public License for more details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
! along with this program. If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

! ========================================================================== !
!! # Plains Cree numerals                           
! ========================================================================== !

!! ## The file for numerals

LEXICON Numerals !!= * @CODE@
pêyak% kihci% mitâtahtomtanaw THOUSAND ;
pêyak% kihci% mitâtahtomitanaw THOUSAND ;
UNDERTHOUSAND ;		! 100-999
TENS ;			! 20-99
TEENS ;			! 10-19
ONES ;			! 1-9
NEARLY ;			! 29-99
ARABIC          ; ! for the arabic numerals !
ROMAN           ; ! for the roman numerals  !
NUM-PREFIXES    ; ! for §34 etc.            !
ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                      !



LEXICON THOUSAND
% ayiwâk%  UNDERTHOUSAND ;	   ! 1100-1999
% ayiwâk%  TENS ;	   ! 1020-1099
% ayiwâk%  TEENS ;	   ! 1010-1019
% ayiwâk%  ONES ;	   ! 1001-1009
 NUM ;	   ! 1000


!===========================
!! ## Here start the 999 numbers
!===========================

LEXICON UNDERTHOUSAND !!= * @CODE@
HUNDREDS ;
mitâtahtomitanaw  HUNDRED ;
mitâtahtomtanaw  HUNDRED ;

LEXICON HUNDREDS !!= * @CODE@
nîso%    CUODI ;
nisto%     CUODI ;
nêwo%  CUODI ;
niyânano%    CUODI ;  !OBS
nikotwâsiko%    CUODI ;
têpakohpo%  CUODI ;
ayinânêwo%  CUODI ;
kêkâmitâtahto%    CUODI ;

LEXICON CUODI !!= * @CODE@
mitâtahtomitanaw    HUNDRED ;
mitâtahtomtanaw   HUNDRED ;
 
LEXICON HUNDRED !!= * @CODE@
% ayiwâk%   TENS ;
% ayiwâk%   TEENS ;
% ayiwâk%    ONES ;
 NUM ;



LEXICON TENS !!= * @CODE@
mitâtaht NUM ;
nîs TEN ;
nîsomi TEN;
nîsi TEN ;
nistomi TEN ;
nêmi TEN ;
niyânanomi TEN ;
nikotwâsomi TEN ;
têpakohpimi TEN ;
têpakohpomi TEN ;
ayinânêwomi TEN ;
kêkâ-mitâtahtomi TEN ;
kêkâmitâtahtomi TEN ;

LEXICON TEN !!= * @CODE@
tanaw%  ONESTONEXT ;
tanaw  NUM ;

LEXICON NEARLY
kêkâc% nistom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nistomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nêwom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nêmi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nêwomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nîyânom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nîyânomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% nikotwâsom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% têpakohpim NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% ayinânêwom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% kêkâ% mitâtahtomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc% kêkâ% mitâtahtom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ% mitâtahtom NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ% mitâtahtomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ% mitatahtomitanaw% ayiwâk% kêkâ% mitâtaht NUM ;
kêkâc-nistomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-nistomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-nêmi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-nêwomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-nêmi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-niyânanomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-niyânanomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-nikotwâsomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-nikotwâsomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-têpakohpimi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-têpakohpomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-têpakohpimi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-têpakohpomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-ayinânêwomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-ayinânêwomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâc-kêkâ-mitâtahtomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-mitâtahtomi NEARLY-TEN ;
kêkâ-mitâtahtomitanaw% kêkâ-mitâtaht NUM ;

LEXICON NEARLY-TEN
tanaw NUM ;


LEXICON ONESTONEXT !!= * @CODE@
pêyakosâp NUM ;
nîsosâp NUM ;
nistosâp NUM ;
nêwosâp NUM ;
niyânanosâp NUM ;
nikotwâsosâp NUM ;
têpakohposâp NUM ;
ayinânêwosâp NUM ;
kêkâ-mitâtahtosâp NUM ;
kêkâmitâtahtosâp NUM ;
pêyako-sâp NUM ;
nîso-sâp NUM ;
nisto-sâp NUM ;
nêwo-sâp NUM ;
niyânano-sâp NUM ;
nikotwâso-sâp NUM ;
têpakohp-sâp NUM ;
ayinânêwo-sâp NUM ;
!kêkâc% nîsitanaw NUM ; ! only for 19 (almost 20)
ayiwâk%  CARDINAL ;



LEXICON TEENS !!= * @CODE@
pêyakosâp NUM ;
nîsosâp NUM ;
nistosâp NUM ;
nêwosâp NUM ;
niyânanosâp NUM ;
nikotwâsosâp NUM ;
nikotwâsikosâp NUM ;
têpakohposâp NUM ;
ayinânêwosâp NUM ;
kêkâ-mitâtahtosâp NUM ;
kêkâmitâtahtosâp NUM ;
kêkâc% nîsitanaw NUM ;
kêkâ-nîsitanaw NUM ;

LEXICON ONES !!= * @CODE@
CARDINAL ;
!ORDINAL ;

LEXICON CARDINAL !!= * @CODE@
pêyak NUM ;
nîso NUM ;
nisto NUM ;
nêwo NUM ;
niyânan NUM ;
nikotwâsik NUM ;
têpakohp NUM ;
ayinânêw NUM ;
kêkâ-mitâtaht NUM ;
kêkâmitâtaht NUM ;
kêkâ% mitâtaht NUM ;

LEXICON NUM !!= * @CODE@ adds +Num+Ipc
+Num+Ipc: # ;
